Mississippi, session 2026, HB4109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The Board of Supervisors of Jackson County, Mississippi, in its discretion, may contribute funds annually in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), out of any available county funds, to the Friends of Arts, Culture and Education (F.A.C.E.), a nonprofit charitable organization that is instrumental in developing and promoting the arts to citizens of Jackson County and the community. (2)  The provisions of this section shall be repealed on July 1, 2030. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.